Utah statutes.
17B-2a-820.   Authority for other governmental entities to acquire property by eminent domain for a public transit district.

The state, a county, or a municipality may, by eminent domain under Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain, acquire within its boundaries a private property interest, including fee simple, easement, air right, right-of-way, or other interest, necessary for the establishment or operation of a public transit district.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

